Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 2 Libraries
13-2-602. Compact enacted.

The Interstate Library Compact is enacted into law and entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the form substantially as follows:

INTERSTATE LIBRARY COMPACT

ARTICLE I. Policy and Purpose.

Because the desire for the services provided by libraries transcends governmental boundaries and can most effectively be satisfied by giving such services to communities and people regardless of jurisdictional lines, it is the policy of the states party to this compact to cooperate and share their responsibilities; to authorize cooperation and sharing with respect to those types of library facilities and services which can be more economically or efficiently developed and maintained on a cooperative basis; and to authorize cooperation and sharing among localities, states, and others in providing joint or cooperative library services in areas where the distribution of population or of existing and potential library resources make the provisions of library service on an interstate basis the most effective way of providing adequate and efficient service.

ARTICLE II. Definitions.

As used in this compact:

(a)

“Public library agency” means any unit or agency of local or state government operating or having power to operate a library.

(b)

“Private library agency” means any nongovernmental entity which operates or assumes a legal obligation to operate a library.

(c)

“Library agreement” means a contract establishing an interstate library district pursuant to this compact or providing for the joint or cooperative furnishing of library services.

ARTICLE III. Interstate Library Districts.

(a)

Any one or more public library agencies in a party state in cooperation with any public library agency or agencies in one or more other party states may establish and maintain an interstate library district. Subject to the provisions of this compact and any other laws of the party states which pursuant hereto remain applicable, such district may establish, maintain, and operate some or all of the library facilities and services for the area concerned in accordance with the terms of a library agreement therefor. Any private library agency or agencies within an interstate library district may cooperate therewith, assume duties, responsibilities, and obligations thereto, and receive benefits therefrom as provided in any library agreement to which the agency or agencies become party.

(b)

Within an interstate library district, and as provided by a library agreement, the performance of library functions may be undertaken on a joint or cooperative basis or may be undertaken by means of one or more arrangements between or among public or private library agencies for the extension of library privileges to the use of facilities or services operated or rendered by one or more of the individual library agencies.

(c)

If a library agreement provides for joint establishment, maintenance, or operation of library facilities or services by an interstate library district, the district shall have power to do any one or more of the following in accordance with the library agreement:

1.

Undertake, administer, and participate in programs or arrangements for securing, lending, or servicing of books and other publications, any other materials suitable to be kept or made available by libraries, library equipment, or for the dissemination of information about libraries, the value and significance of particular items therein, and the use thereof.

2.

Accept for any of its purposes under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services (conditional or otherwise), from any state or the United States or any subdivision or agency thereof, or interstate agency, or from any institution, person, firm, or corporation, and receive, utilize, and dispose of them.

3.

Operate mobile library units or equipment for the purpose of rendering bookmobile service within the district.

4.

Employ professional, technical, clerical, and other personnel, and fix terms of employment, compensation, and other appropriate benefits; and where desirable, provide for the in-service training of personnel.

5.

Sue and be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction.

6.

Acquire, hold, and dispose of any real or personal property or any interest or interests therein as may be appropriate to the rendering of library service.

7.

Construct, maintain, and operate a library, including any appropriate branches thereof.

8.

Do such other things as may be incidental to or appropriate for the carrying out of any of the foregoing powers.

ARTICLE IV. Interstate Library Districts, Governing Board.

(a)

An interstate library district which establishes, maintains, or operates any facilities or services in its own right shall have a governing board which shall direct the affairs of the district and act for it in all matters relating to its business. Each participating public library agency in the district shall be represented on the governing board which shall be organized and conduct its business in accordance with provision therefor in the library agreement. But in no event shall a governing board meet less often than twice a year.

(b)

Any private library agency or agencies party to a library agreement establishing an interstate library district may be represented on or advise with the governing board of the district in such manner as the library agreement may provide.

ARTICLE V. State Library Agency Cooperation.

Any two or more state library agencies of two or more of the party states may undertake and conduct joint or cooperative library programs, render joint or cooperative library services, and enter into and perform arrangements for the cooperative or joint acquisition, use, housing, and disposition of items or collections of materials which, by reason of expense, rarity, specialized nature, or infrequency of demand therefor would be appropriate for central collection and shared use. Any such programs, services, or arrangements may include provision for the exercise on a cooperative or joint basis of any power exercisable by an interstate library district, and an agreement embodying any such program, service, or arrangement shall contain provision covering the subjects detailed in Article VI of this compact for interstate library agreements.

ARTICLE VI. Library Agreements.

(a)

In order to provide for any joint or cooperative undertaking pursuant to this compact, public and private library agencies may enter into library agreements. Any agreement executed pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall, as among the parties to the agreement:

1.

Detail the specific nature of the services, programs, facilities, arrangements, or properties to which it is applicable.

2.

Provide for the allocation of costs and other financial responsibilities.

3.

Specify the respective rights, duties, obligations, and liabilities of the parties.

4.

Set forth the terms and conditions for duration, renewal, termination, abrogation, disposal of joint or common property, if any, and all other matters which may be appropriate to the proper effectuation and performance of the agreement.

(b)

No public or private library agency shall undertake to exercise itself, or jointly with any other library agency, by means of a library agreement any power prohibited to the agency by the constitution or statutes of its state.

(c)

No library agreement shall become effective until filed with the compact administrator of each state involved, and approved in accordance with Article VII of this compact.

ARTICLE VII. Approval of Library Agreements.

(a)

Every library agreement made pursuant to this compact shall, prior to and as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the attorney general of each state in which a public library agency party thereto is situated, who shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of his state. The attorneys general shall approve any agreement submitted to them unless they shall find that it does not meet the conditions set forth herein and shall detail in writing addressed to the governing bodies of the public library agencies concerned, the specific respects in which the proposed agreement fails to meet the requirements of law. Failure to disapprove an agreement submitted hereunder within ninety days of its submission shall constitute approval thereof.

(b)

In the event that a library agreement made pursuant to this compact shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or it as to all matters within his or its jurisdiction in the same manner and subject to the same requirements governing the action of the attorneys general pursuant to paragraph (a) of this article. This requirement of submission and approval shall be in addition to and not in substitution for the requirement of submission to and approval by the attorneys general.

ARTICLE VIII. Other Laws Applicable.

Nothing in this compact or in any library agreement shall be construed to supersede, alter, or otherwise impair any obligation imposed on any library by otherwise applicable law, nor to authorize the transfer or disposal of any property held in trust by a library agency in a manner contrary to the terms of such trust.

ARTICLE IX. Appropriations and Aid.

(a)

Any public library agency party to a library agreement may appropriate funds to the interstate library district established thereby in the same manner and to the same extent as to a library wholly maintained by it and, subject to the laws of the state in which the public library agency is situated, may pledge its credit in support of an interstate library district established by the agreement.

(b)

Subject to the provisions of the library agreement pursuant to which it functions and the laws of the states in which the district is situated, an interstate library district may claim and receive any state and federal aid which may be available to library agencies.

ARTICLE X. Compact Administrator.

Each state shall designate a compact administrator with whom copies of all library agreements to which his state or any public library agency thereof is party shall be filed. The administrator shall have any other powers as may be conferred upon him by the laws of his state and may consult and cooperate with the compact administrators of other party states and take such steps as may effectuate the purposes of this compact. If the laws of a party state so provide, the state may designate one or more deputy compact administrators in addition to its compact administrator.

ARTICLE XI. Entry into Force and Withdrawal.

(a)

This compact shall enter into force and effect immediately upon its enactment into law by any two states. Thereafter, it shall enter into force and effect as to any other state upon the enactment thereof by that state.

(b)

This compact shall continue in force with respect to a party state and remain binding upon that state until six (6) months after the state has given notice to each other party state of the repeal thereof. The withdrawal shall not be construed to relieve any party to a library agreement entered into pursuant to this compact from any obligation of that agreement prior to the end of its duration as provided therein.

ARTICLE XII. Construction and Severability.

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-310.

13-2-603. Compact administrators.

The Governor shall appoint an officer of this state who shall be the compact administrator pursuant to Article X of the compact. The Governor shall also appoint one (1) or more deputy compact administrators pursuant to that article.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-314.

13-2-604. Notice of withdrawal.

In the event of withdrawal from the compact, the Governor shall send and receive any notices required by Article XI(b) of the compact.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-315.

13-2-605. Prerequisites for construction or maintenance of libraries.

No county, city, town, or combination thereof acting as a regional library district of this state shall be party to a library agreement which provides for the construction or maintenance of a library pursuant to Article III, subdivision (c)7 of the compact, nor pledge its credit in support of such a library, or contribute to the capital financing thereof, except:

(1)

After compliance with the Arkansas Constitution and any laws applicable to the county, city, town, or combination thereof relating to or governing capital outlays and the pledging of credit; and

(2)

After submitting the plan to the State Library Board for approval.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-311.

13-2-606. Interstate library districts included.

(a)

An interstate library district lying partly within this state may claim to be entitled to receive state aid in support of its functions to the same extent and in the same manner as such functions are eligible for support when carried on by entities wholly within this state.

(b)

For the purposes of computing and apportioning state aid to an interstate library district, this state will consider that portion of the area which lies within this state as an independent entity for the performance of the aided function or functions and compute and apportion the aid accordingly.

(c)

Subject to any applicable laws of this state, such a district also may apply for and be entitled to receive any federal aid for which it may be eligible.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-313.

Subchapter 7

— Confidentiality of Patrons' Records

13-2-701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Confidential library records” means documents or information in any format retained in a library that identifies a patron as having requested, used, or obtained specific materials, including, but not limited to, circulation of library books, materials, computer database searches, interlibrary loan transactions, reference queries, patent searches, requests for photocopies of library materials, title reserve requests, or the use of audiovisual materials, films, or records; and

(2)

“Patron” means any individual who requests, uses, or receives services, books, or other materials from a library.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 1.

13-2-702. Penalty.

(a)

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or thirty (30) days in jail, or both, or a sentence of appropriate public service or education, or both.

(b)

No liability shall result from any lawful disclosure permitted by this subchapter.

(c)

No action may be brought under this subchapter unless the action is begun within two (2) years from the date of the act complained of or the date of discovery.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 2.

13-2-703. Disclosure prohibited.

(a)

Library records which contain names or other personally identifying details regarding the patrons of public, school, academic, and special libraries and library systems supported in whole or in part by public funds shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except as permitted by this subchapter.

(b)

Public libraries shall use an automated or Gaylord-type circulation system that does not identify a patron with circulated materials after materials are returned.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 2.

13-2-704. Disclosure permitted.

A library may disclose personally identifiable information concerning any patron to:

(1)

The patron;

(2)

Any person with the informed, written consent of the patron;

(3)

A law enforcement agency or civil court, under a search warrant; or

(4)

Any person, including without limitation the patron, who has received an automated telephone notification or other electronic communication for overdue materials or reserve materials if the person making the request can verify the telephone number or email address to which the notice was sent.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 2; 2003, No. 677, § 1; 2009, No. 757, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added (4) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment deleted “given at the time the disclosure is sought” at the end of (2); and made minor stylistic changes in (3) and (4).

13-2-705. Construction — Statistics.

(a)

No provision of this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit any library or any business operating jointly with a library from disclosing information for the purpose of:

(1)

Collecting overdue books, documents, films, or other items or materials owned or otherwise belonging to the library;

(2)

Collecting fines on overdue books, documents, films, or other items or materials; and

(3)

Contacting its patrons by telephone, mail service, or other medium for the purpose of notifying, informing, and educating patrons or otherwise promoting the legitimate programs, policies, and other interests of the library.

(b)

Aggregate statistics shown from registration and circulation records with all personal identification removed may be released or used by a library or library system for research or planning purposes.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 2; 1995, No. 612, § 1.

13-2-706. Use of information in evidence.

Personally identifiable information obtained in any manner other than as provided in this subchapter shall not be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, arbitration, or other proceeding before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of the state or political subdivision of the state.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 903, § 2.

Subchapter 8

— Arkansas Library Materials Security Law

13-2-801. Short title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Library Materials Security Law”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 1.

13-2-802. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

“Library materials” means books, manuscripts, letters, newspapers, court records, films, microfilms, tape recordings, phonograph records, lithographs, prints, photographs, or any other written or printed documents, graphic material of any nature, and other personal property which is the property or in the custody of or entrusted to a public or private library, museum, archive, or other depository;

(2)

“Mutilate” means, in addition to its commonly accepted definition, the willful removal or separation of constituent parts of an item of library materials, causing library materials to be exposed to damage; and

(3)

“Without authorization” means contrary to rules which set forth policies governing access to library materials and include eligibility for library patronage and lending procedures.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 2.

13-2-803. Unauthorized removal or willful mutilation of library materials.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to remove library materials without authorization from the premises wherein such materials are maintained or to retain possession of library materials without authorization.

(2)

It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully mutilate library materials.

(b)(1)

A violation of this section is a Class B felony if the value of the property is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more.

(2)

A violation of this section is a Class C felony if the value of the property is less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(3)

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor if the value of the property is five hundred dollars ($500) or less.

(c)

However, before a charge of retaining possession of library materials without authorization shall be filed against any person, the library shall send written notice by ordinary mail addressed to the last known address of the person who checked out or otherwise removed the books or materials from the library, notifying the person that:

(1)

If the books or materials are not returned to the library within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice, charges will be filed against the person under the provisions of this section; and

(2)

Upon conviction, the person may be fined in an amount as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 3.

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

13-2-804. Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to all libraries, museums, archives, and other depositories operated by an agency, board, commission, department, or officer of the State of Arkansas, by private persons, societies, or organizations, or by agencies or officers of municipalities, counties, schools, and institutions of higher learning, or of any other political subdivisions of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 4.

13-2-805. Reasonable detention and questioning to determine whether offense was committed.

(a)

If a person employed by a library or a person charged with the supervision thereof has reason to believe that a person has committed or has attempted to commit any offense under this subchapter or that the person has concealed any library material upon his or her person or within his or her belongings, then the person may be detained and questioned in a reasonable manner for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not an offense has been committed.

(b)

The detention and questioning shall not render the employee civilly liable for slander, false arrest, false imprisonment, malicious prosecution, unlawful detention, or otherwise, if the library employee or person charged with the supervision of the library acts in good faith and in a reasonable manner.

(c)

For the purpose of ascertaining whether or not an offense has been committed, libraries, museums, archives, and other depositories may establish policies that require persons entering and exiting the premises wherein library materials are maintained to open and disclose the contents of any bags, purses, briefcases, and other containers which are being carried by or are in the possession of the persons.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 6; 1997, No. 358, § 1.

13-2-806. Relation with other criminal or civil proceedings.

(a)

The provisions of this subchapter are supplemental to other criminal statutes.

(b)

An acquittal or conviction obtained under this subchapter shall not be a bar to civil proceedings or actions arising from the same incident.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 906, § 5.

Subchapter 9

— Regional Library System Law

13-2-901. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Regional Library System Law”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-902. Purpose.

(a)

In order to better coordinate the services of libraries and library systems in different counties, as is permitted under both Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 30, and Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38, when city and county public libraries are formed in the various counties of the State of Arkansas and taxes are levied in those cities and counties for the purpose of maintaining and operating a public library or library system or when counties, cities, or towns form public libraries or provide library services for their citizens without levying specific taxes, the city and county public libraries may organize themselves into regional library systems in accordance with this subchapter.

(b)(1)

The provisions of this subchapter for creating a regional library system in Arkansas shall be supplemental to and in addition to the present laws relating to the powers of counties and municipalities to contract for services and to enter into interlocal cooperation agreements under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, §25-20-101 et seq.

(2)

This subchapter shall not be construed to prohibit a county or municipality from joining with other counties or cities to create other regional or multijurisdictional arrangements to provide library services for their citizens.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-903. Creation of a regional library system.

(a)

Any two (2) or more municipalities, any two (2) or more counties, or any one (1) or more municipalities together with any one (1) or more counties are authorized to create and become members of a regional library system as prescribed in this subchapter.

(b)

Upon the recommendation by the city library board of trustees or the county library board, the governing body of each municipality and county desiring to create and become a member of a system may by ordinance determine that it is in the best interest of the municipality or county in accomplishing the purposes of this subchapter to create and become a member of a system to better coordinate the services of libraries of different cities and counties as is permitted under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 30, § 4, and Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38, § 4, or as is otherwise permitted under interlocal cooperation agreements.

(c)

The ordinance shall:

(1)

Specify the desire that a system be created as a public body and a body corporate and politic under this subchapter;

(2)

Set forth the names of the municipalities or counties, or both, which are proposed to be initial members of the system;

(3)

Set forth the name which is proposed for the system;

(4)

Specify the powers to be granted to the system and its board of trustees and any limitations on the excercise of the powers granted, including limitations on the system's area of operations and the use of system funds and facilities;

(5)

Specify the number of trustees on the board, the length of terms, and the voting rights of each trustee;

(6)

Establish the proportion of financial assistance and support to be apportioned among the participating jurisdictions in the system; and

(7)

Set forth the terms and conditions for the withdrawal from the system and the division of any system funds or property.

(d)(1)

The ordinance shall be signed by the mayor of each municipality and the county judge of each county, attested by the respective clerks, and sent to the Secretary of State and to the Arkansas State Library. The Secretary of State shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his or her office.

(2)

When the ordinance has been made, filed, and recorded as provided in this subchapter, the system shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the ordinance.

(e)(1)

Any ordinance filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this section may be amended from time to time, and any other municipality or county may become a new member in the system with the consent of the members of the system evidenced by ordinances of their governing bodies.

(2)

The amendment shall be signed and filed with the Secretary of State and the Arkansas State Library in the manner provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-904. Board of trustees.

(a)(1)(A)

The management and control of a regional library system shall be vested in a board of trustees, who shall be appointed by the county or municipal library boards from among the membership of the county or municipal library boards.

(B)

In the absence of the county or municipal library board, the governing body of the county or municipality shall appoint the trustees to the regional library board.

(2)

The number of trustees shall be agreed upon by the governing bodies of the municipality or municipalities and with the county quorum courts which have agreed with each other or among themselves to create, maintain, and support the system.

(b)

Each trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the municipality or county represented on the regional library board.

(c)(1)

Vacancies on the regional library board shall be filled in the same manner in which members of the regional library board were first appointed.

(2)

Any trustee who shall not attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the regional library board without reasonable explanation shall be subject to removal by the municipal or county body which is the appointing authority.

(d)(1)

A trustee shall not receive salary or other compensation for his or her service.

(2)

However, a trustee may be reimbursed for necessary travel and mileage expenses if reimbursements are adopted as a policy by the regional library board.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-905. Powers and duties.

(a)(1)

Immediately after their initial appointment, the board of trustees of the regional library system shall meet and elect the officers as they deem necessary.

(2)

A quorum of this board shall be a majority of the total number of members.

(3)

The board shall:

(A)

Adopt such bylaws, rules and regulations, and policies for their own guidance, including personnel policies, and for the governing of the system as they deem reasonable and necessary;

(B)

Meet at least one (1) time in each calendar quarter;

(C)

Have the custody and supervision of all property of the system, including the rooms or buildings constructed, leased, or set apart for the system;

(D)

Employ a system director, who shall serve at the will of the board, which shall prescribe his or her duties and fix his or her compensation;

(E)

Have exclusive control of the finances of the system;

(F)

Cause an annual audit to be performed in accordance with Arkansas law for audits of local government entities;

(G)

Be responsible for any fine or fee money for special library services and accept any grants, gifts of money, or property for use of the system and use it for purposes as the board deems reasonable and necessary;

(H)

May purchase and dispose of equipment as provided in Arkansas law for county government purchase and disposition of county government property;

(I)

Develop and enforce policies and penalties for persons injuring library property and materials or failing to return any book, periodical, or property belonging to the system. The board may refuse the use of the library to those offenders; and

(J)

Do all other acts necessary for the orderly and efficient management and control of the system.

(b)

No expenditure made or contracted by the board shall be binding on any participating municipalities or counties so as to require any payment in excess of funds made available for library purposes under this subchapter.

(c)(1)

There shall be one (1) regional library director for each system.

(2)

The director shall have a master's degree from an accredited American Library Association program.

(3)

The director shall administer and establish procedures in accordance with policies established by the board.

(4)

The director's duties shall include:

(A)

Employment and supervision of system staff;

(B)

Financial and statistical management of the system, including initial preparation of the annual budget;

(C)

Reporting to the board on system operations and services; and

(D)

Other acts necessary for the orderly and efficient administration of the system.

(d)(1)

If not provided for by the system or by one (1) of the participating jurisdictions of the system, all eligible employees of a system shall be entitled to comparable fringe benefit and retirement benefit coverage as are other county employees in the headquarters county.

(2)

Costs for these benefits shall be apportioned among the participating municipalities and counties of the system.

(e)(1)

On a monthly basis each county and municipality supporting a system shall transmit appropriated amounts of tax revenues and other appropriated funds to the system pursuant to the interlocal agreement, the regional library ordinance, or the contract.

(2)

All regional funds shall be deposited in one (1) or more public depositories previously selected by the board.

(3)(A)

All funds shall be placed in the depository or depositories selected by the board in the same manner as provided by law for the selection of county depositories.

(B)

The depository shall place on deposit with the director the same securities as are required by law for county deposits.

(4)

The board shall, by appropriate order recorded in its minutes, authorize the director to expend system funds for lawful purposes only and in accordance with its budget.

(f)(1)

The board shall have the power to purchase or lease grounds or to purchase, lease, erect, and occupy appropriate buildings for the use of all public libraries in the system. When a building erected or purchased by the board is not adapted to its purpose or needs, the board may remodel or reconstruct the building.

(2)

The board may also sell or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property that it deems no longer necessary or useful for library purposes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-906. Annual reports.

At the end of each calendar year, the board of trustees of every regional library system shall make a report to the governing body in the county or counties or municipality or municipalities wherein the board serves, showing the condition of the system during the year and other statistics and information as the board deems of public interest.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

13-2-907. Contracts for library services and with other libraries.

(a)

Regional library systems are authorized to contract with other regional libraries, municipal libraries, or county public libraries or with library authorities of any college or university or any privately organized or endowed library, whereby common library branches or buildings or joint library services for the residents or patrons of the participating jurisdictions may be established and maintained in joint effort.

(b)

The contract shall provide for the division of any cost of establishing, maintaining, and operating the library and library services between the system and the other entity, even though the entity may be located without this state.

(c)

The contract shall become effective only from and after its ratification by a majority of the members of the board of trustees of the regional library system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 13.

Subchapter 10

— Arkansas Digital Library Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-2-1001. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to as the “Arkansas Digital Library Act”.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1810, § 1.

13-2-1002. Creation.

(a)(1)

The Division of Higher Education and the Arkansas State Library shall develop a digitized collection of information that includes information that is in the public domain, cleared for public distribution over the internet, and to which students of public postsecondary schools in Arkansas have access.

(2)

The digitized information under this subchapter shall be available for public access in at least one (1) location in each Arkansas county.

(b)(1)

The division and the library shall develop criteria regarding the:

(A)

Selection of materials to be digitized;

(B)

Need for public access; and

(C)

Means of cataloging or indexing the materials and digitizing them.

(2)

Materials to be digitized may include:

(A)

Print documents;

(B)

Texts;

(C)

Manuscripts;

(D)

Photographs;

(E)

Art reproductions;

(F)

Postcards;

(G)

Illustrations;

(H)

Sound;

(I)

Film; and

(J)

Video.

(c)

The division shall make grants under this subchapter to assist public postsecondary institutions and other public or private entities in:

(1)

Selecting and digitizing information; and

(2)

Developing and providing access to the digital collection in at least one (1) location in each Arkansas county.

(d)(1)

Each postsecondary public institution in Arkansas shall cooperate with the division in developing the digitized collection under this subchapter.

(2)

Each postsecondary public institution and any entity receiving a grant under this subchapter shall develop a plan to inform the public regarding the use of the resources made available under this subchapter.

(3)

Funds made available under this subchapter may be used by the receiving entities to obtain matching funds from federal programs.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1810, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2235.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.